Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4803
Petition; contents.

A petition for emancipation filed pursuant to section 43-4802 shall state:

(1) The name, age, and address of the minor;

(2) The names and addresses of the parents of the minor, if known;

(3) The name and address of any legal guardian of the minor, if known;

(4) If the name or address of a parent or legal guardian is unknown, the name and address of the child’s nearest known relative residing within this state;

(5) Whether the minor is a party to or the subject of a pending judicial proceeding in this state or any other jurisdiction, or the subject of a judicial order of any description issued in connection with such pending judicial proceeding, if known;

(6) The state, county, and case number of any court case in which an order of support has been entered, if known;

(7) That the minor is seeking a judgment of emancipation;

(8) That the minor is filing the petition as a free and voluntary act; and

(9) Specific facts to support the petition, including:

(a) That the minor willingly lives apart from his or her parents or legal guardian;

(b) That the minor is able to support himself or herself without financial assistance, or, in the alternative, the minor has no parent, legal guardian, or custodian who is providing support;

(c) That the minor is mature and knowledgeable to manage his or her affairs without the guidance of a parent or legal guardian;

(d) That the minor has demonstrated an ability and commitment to obtain and maintain education, vocational training, or employment;

(e) The reasons why emancipation would be in the best interests of the minor; and

(f) The purposes for which emancipation is requested.

Laws 2018, LB714, § 3.